Illinois, session 104th, HB5744.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $500,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 7for grants to the Kane County State's Attorney's Office to 8expand the Human Exploitation Unit.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.